Utah statutes.
75-5a-110.   Manner of creating custodial property and effecting transfer --
Designation of initial custodian -- Control.
(1)  Custodial property is created and a transfer is made when:
(a)  an uncertificated security or a certificated security in registered form
is either:
(i)  registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the
transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: "as
custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform Transfers to
Minors Act"; or
(ii)  delivered if in certificated form, or any document necessary for the
transfer of an uncertificated security is delivered, together with any
necessary endorsement, to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust
company as custodian, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form
in Subsection (2);
(b)  money is paid or delivered, or a security held in the name of a broker,
financial institution, or its nominee is transferred to a broker, or financial
institution for credit to an account in the name of the transferor, an adult
other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the
words: "as custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform
Transfers to Minors Act";
(c)  the ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract
is either:
(i)  registered with the issuer in the name of the transferor, an adult other
than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words:
"as custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform Transfers
to Minors Act"; or
(ii)  assigned in a writing delivered to an adult other than the transferor or
to a trust company whose name in the assignment is followed in substance by
the words: "as custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the
Uniform Transfers to Minors Act";
(d)  an irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment or an irrevocable
present right to future payment under a contract is the subject of a written
notification delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor that the right
is transferred to the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a
trust company, whose name in the notification is followed in substance by the
words: "as custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform
Transfers to Minors Act";
(e)  an interest in real property is recorded in the name of the transferor,
an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance
by the words: "as custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the
Uniform Transfers to Minors Act";
(f)  a certificate of title issued by a department or agency of a state or of
the United States which evidences title to tangible personal property is
either:
(i)  issued in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor,
or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: "as custodian for
...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act";
or
(ii)  delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company,
endorsed to that person followed in substance by the words: "as custodian for
...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act";
or
(g)  an interest in any property not described in Subsections (1)(a) through
(f) is transferred to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company
by a written instrument in substantially the form set forth in Subsection (2).
(2)  An instrument in the following form satisfies the requirements of
Subsections (1)(a)(ii) and (1)(g):  "Transfer Under the Uniform Transfers to
Minors Act
I, ...............  (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if
a fiduciary) hereby transfer to ...............  (name of custodian), as
custodian for ...............  (name of minor) under the Uniform Transfers to
Minors Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial property
sufficient to identify it).
Dated: ............................................................
........................................................................
(Signature)
....................  (name of custodian) acknowledges receipt of the property
described above as custodian for the minor named above under the Uniform
Transfers to Minors Act.
Dated: ..........................
........................................................................
(Signature of Custodian)"
(3)  A transferor shall place the custodian in control of the custodial
property as soon as practicable.
